lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/l.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Indef +Def
^UUML ^IUML
%>

LEXICON Root
nouns ;

LEXICON nouns
bók f1 ;
gøta:gøt f2 ;
dagur:dag m1 ;

LEXICON f1
+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: # ;
+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: # ;
+N+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Sg+Dat+Indef: # ;

+N+Pl+Nom+Indef:^IUML%>ur # ;
+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: # ;
+N+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;


LEXICON f2
+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: # ;
+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: # ;
+N+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Sg+Dat+Indef: # ;

+N+Pl+Nom+Indef:^IUML%>ur # ;
+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: # ;
+N+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;


LEXICON m1
+N+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur # ;
+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: # ;
+N+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s # ;
+N+Sg+Dat+Indef:^IUML%>i # ;

+N+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a # ;
+N+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um # ;
